California statutes. Financial Code
Each association shall close its books at the close of business at least annually, or more often if authorized or required in writing by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 361, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

6454.

No association by any system of accounting or any device of bookkeeping shall, either directly or indirectly, enter any of its assets upon its books in the name of any other person, partnership, association, or corporation or under any title or designation that is not truly descriptive of the assets.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6455.

(a) Each association shall maintain complete loan and investment records, and shall do so in a manner satisfactory to the commissioner. Detailed records necessary to make determinations of compliance by an association with the requirements of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 7200) and other provisions of this division shall be maintained at all times.

(b) The record of each real estate loan or other secured loan or investment shall contain documentation satisfactory to the commissioner of the type, adequacy and characteristics of the security.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6456.

Each mutual association shall maintain membership records which shall show the name and address of the member and the date of membership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 983, Sec. 4.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

6457.

Each capital stock association shall maintain a register of stockholders.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6458.

(a) Any association may cause any or all records of the association to be copied or reproduced by any photostatic, photographic, or microfilming process that correctly and permanently copies, reproduces, or forms a medium for copying or reproducing the original record on a film or other durable material.

(b) Any copy or reproduction made under subdivision (a) shall be deemed to be an original record for all purposes and shall be treated as an original record in all courts or administrative agencies for the purpose of its admissibility in
 evidence.

(c) A facsimile, exemplification, or certified copy of any copy made pursuant to subdivision (a), or a reproduction produced from a film record, shall, for all purposes, be deemed a facsimile, exemplification, or certified copy of the original record.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 6460 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 287, Sec. 15.   Effective July 6, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Statutory Net Worth; Reserve Accounts [6475. - 6477.]

6475.

(a) Each association shall maintain an adequate statutory net worth appropriate for the conduct of its business and the protection of its savings account holders.

(b) The commissioner shall fix a minimum statutory net worth requirement applicable to all associations, which shall not be less than 3 percent of an association’s total assets. In defining total assets, the commissioner may issue regulations to exclude from the total asset figure any asset items deemed appropriate by the commissioner.

(c) If
 the statutory net worth falls below the level specified by the commissioner, the commissioner may require the association to increase its statutory net worth within the time and in a manner designated by the commissioner, so as to bring the amount to the level determined adequate under this section, and may require the association to do any one or more of the following:

(1) Increase its liquid assets and maintain that increased liquidity at the level specified by the commissioner.

(2) Cease to:

(A) Accept savings accounts of all classes or categories, except in exchange for accounts already outstanding.

(B) Accept savings accounts of any particular class, category, or amount.

(C) Receive
 additional funds upon savings accounts already outstanding other than installment accounts.

The provisions of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) shall not prevent an association from crediting to savings accounts the interest earned on the accounts.

(3) Cease all lending, lending in a particular area, or making a particular type or category of loans.

(4) Cease purchase of loans or other investments.

(5) Cease or limit promotional expenditures.

(6) Convene a meeting or meetings of its board of directors with the commissioner in attendance to accomplish the objectives of this section.

(7) Take any other steps that the commissioner deems necessary to
 safeguard the interests of the association and the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 718, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

6476.

Each association shall set up and maintain the reserves required by, and may set up and maintain any additional reserves that are permitted by, this division.

The board of directors may make additional transfers to surplus or other reserve accounts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6477.

Any association which, for the purpose of evading provisions of this division or any order of the commissioner, knowingly participates, directly or indirectly, in an exchange with another association of any loan, investment, or other asset held by either association in violation of any provision of this division or any order of the commissioner, shall, upon direction of the commissioner, set up and maintain a reserve in the full amount of the asset acquired and shall not include that reserve in its statutory net worth.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1158, Sec. 3.   Effective September 26, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Powers of Associations [6500. - 6558.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Powers [6500. - 6530.]

6500.

(a) Each association incorporated pursuant to or operating under the provisions of this division shall have all the powers enumerated, authorized, and permitted by this division and other rights, privileges, and powers, and may engage in any activities singly or with others, that are incidental to or reasonably necessary or appropriate for the accomplishment of the objects and purposes of the association, as provided by this division. Among others, and except as otherwise limited by the provisions of this division, each association shall have the powers set out in this chapter. Associations shall be
 subject to the provisions of the General Corporation Law (Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) Title 1 of the Corporations Code) and shall also have all the powers and privileges provided in the General Corporation Law of this state to other corporations except those powers and privileges that are expressly denied to associations in this division. If any provision of the General Corporation Law is inconsistent with any provision of this division, the provisions of this division shall prevail.

(b) All references in this division to the General Corporation Law mean the General Corporation Law effective January 1, 1977, and any subsequent amendments thereto.

(c) In the application of Chapter 23 (commencing with Section 2300) of the Corporations Code to associations, the definition of effective date in Section 2300 is January 1, 1978.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 287, Sec. 16.   Effective July 6, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

6501.

An association may have perpetual existence, adopt and use a corporate seal which may be affixed by imprint, facsimile, or otherwise, and adopt and amend bylaws as provided in this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6502.

An association may sue, be sued, complain, and defend in any court.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6502.5.

An association may, acquire, hold, sell, develop, subdivide, dispose of, and convey real and personal property consistent with its objects and powers. It may mortgage, pledge, or lease any real or personal property and may take the property by gift, devise, or bequest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

6503.

(a) No association or subsidiary thereof, without the prior written consent of the commissioner, shall enter into either of the following:

(1) Any transaction or modification of any transaction with an affiliated person to buy, lease, or sell real or personal property, or take that property by gift.

(2) Any consulting contracts or contracts for services with an affiliated person.

(b) As a condition to approving a transaction specified in subdivision (a), the commissioner shall make both of the following findings:

(1) The terms of the transaction are fair to, and in the best interests of, the savings association or subsidiary. In the case of real or personal property transactions, this finding shall be supported by an appraisal not prepared by an affiliated person or employee of the association or subsidiary.

(2) The transaction was approved in advance by a resolution duly adopted with full disclosure by at least a majority, with no director having an interest in the transaction voting, of the entire board of directors of the association or subsidiary, or alternatively, by a majority of the total votes eligible to be cast by the voting members or stockholders of the association at a meeting
 called for that purpose, with no votes cast by proxies not solicited for that purpose. For purposes of this subdivision, “full disclosure” shall include, but not be limited to, (A) the affiliated person’s source of financing for any real property involved in the transaction and (B) whether the association or any subsidiary thereof has a deposit relationship with any financial institution or holding company or affiliate thereof providing the financing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 165.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6504.

(a) Except by the prior written consent of the commissioner, an association in organization that is not a member of a federal home loan bank may borrow money from any source not more than an aggregate amount equal to 25 percent of its assets on the date of borrowing, and may pledge and otherwise encumber any of its assets to secure its debts.

(b) An association that is a member of a federal home loan bank may borrow money from any source without limitation and may pledge and otherwise encumber any of its assets to secure its debts or savings
 accounts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 983, Sec. 5.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

6505.

(a) An association may issue and sell, directly or through underwriters, capital certificates that represent nonwithdrawable capital contributions, and constitute part of the reserves and statutory net worth of the association. The certificates shall have no voting rights and shall be subordinate to all savings accounts, debt obligations, and claims of creditors of the association. The certificates shall constitute a claim in liquidation against any reserves, surplus, and other statutory net worth accounts remaining after the payment in full of all savings accounts, debt obligations, and claims of creditors. The capital certificates
 shall be entitled to the payment of interest prior to the allocation of any income to surplus or other statutory net worth accounts of the association and may be issued with a fixed rate of interest or with a prior claim to distribution of a specified percentage of any net income remaining after required allocations to reserves, or a combination of those features. Losses may be charged against capital certificates only after reserves, surplus, and other statutory net worth accounts have been exhausted.

(b) To the extent permitted by its articles of incorporation, an association authorized to issue capital stock may provide for the conversion of capital certificates into common stock.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6507.

An association may qualify as and become a member of a federal home loan bank and a home loan bank established as an agency or instrumentality of this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6508.

An association may become a member of, deal with, maintain reserves or deposits with, or make reasonable payments or contributions to any organization or instrumentality whether government or private, to the extent that the organization or instrumentality assists in furthering or facilitating the association’s purposes, powers, services, or community responsibilities, and it may comply with any reasonable requirements or conditions of eligibility.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6509.

An association may act as depository for receipt of payments of federal or state taxes and loan funds, and may satisfy any related federal or state statutory or regulatory requirements, including pledging of assets as collateral, payment of interest at prescribed rates, and, notwithstanding any other provision of this division, may issue the accounts subject to the right of immediate withdrawal.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6510.

An association may sell any loan, including a participating interest in a loan, at any time.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6511.

Loans secured by real property may be sold to, and are legal investments for, among others, any public or private pension fund, credit union, labor union fund, or public employee association and may be purchased by those institutions directly from an association. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed as altering any limits imposed by law on the extent of participation in an investment that is made by any entity covered by this subdivision.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6513.

An association may service loans and investments for others.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6514.

(a) An association may act, and receive compensation for so acting, as trustee of any trust created or organized in the United States and forming a part of a stock bonus, pension, or profit-sharing plan that qualifies for specific tax treatment under Section 401 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C., Sec. 401), as amended.

(b) It may also act, and receive compensation for so acting, as trustee or custodian of an individual retirement account within the meaning of Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

(c) Assets of the trust or account must be invested only in savings accounts of the association, in obligations or securities issued by the association, or in other investments that are approved by the commissioner.

(d) All assets held in fiduciary capacity by any association under the authority of this section may be commingled and consolidated for appropriate purposes of investment if records reflecting each separate beneficial interest are maintained by the fiduciary or by another appropriate party who assumes that duty.

(e) The trustee or custodian may accept noncash assets under this section if the assets are converted into cash as soon as practicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 32.5.)
-------------------------------------------

6515.

(a) Notwithstanding any provisions of Division 1 (commencing with Section 99), Section 202 of the Corporations Code, or any other provisions of law relating to trusts and trust authority, subject to regulations of the commissioner, an association may act as trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, or in any other fiduciary capacity in which banks, trust companies, or other corporations are permitted to act under the laws of this state, directly or through a state or nationally chartered subsidiary.

(b) All acts provided in this code to be performed by the commissioner, the State Treasurer, or other public officials for or in respect to the deposit of securities by trust companies for the protection of court and private trusts shall be performed as well for or in respect to the deposit of securities by any association or the trust companies of any association organized or doing business under the laws of this state, or by any federal association authorized to transact a trust business. An association may advertise its authority to engage in and conduct a trust business and to advertise for and solicit a trust business in this state, notwithstanding any other provision of law.

(c) Pursuant to the authority contained in Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution, the restrictions upon rates of interest contained in Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution
 shall not apply to any obligations of, loans made by, or forbearances of, an association or federal association, or a service corporation which is authorized to exercise trust powers, when the association, federal association, or service corporation is acting in its fiduciary capacity as trustee.

(d) Subdivision (c) creates and authorizes an exempt class of persons pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV of the Constitution. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subdivision (c) does not exempt an association, federal association, or a service corporation of such associations, from complying with all other laws and regulations governing the business in which the association, federal association, or service corporation is engaged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1064, Sec. 552.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative July 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

6516.

(a) Subject to regulations issued by the commissioner, an association may own and use or participate in the use or ownership and use of remote service units.

(b) A remote service unit is not a branch or agency.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6517.

Subject to Regulation E (12 CFR Part 205) and to rules and regulations of the commissioner, an association may transfer funds between holders of savings accounts, and third parties, or their designees, by means of an electronic funds transfer system. No system or any part of it, including terminals or processing centers, shall of itself be considered a branch office or agency.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6518.

(a) An association may maintain and rent safes, boxes, or other receptacles or premises for the safekeeping of personal property upon terms and conditions that may be agreed upon.

(b) An association that rents or otherwise makes safe-deposit boxes available to the public is entitled to all of the remedies set forth in Article 2 (commencing with Section 1660) of Chapter 13 of Division 1, and may dispose of the unclaimed contents of safe-deposit boxes in the manner set forth in that article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6519.

An association may sell money orders, travel checks, and similar instruments drawn by it on its bank accounts or as agent for any organization empowered to sell the instruments through agents within this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6520.

An association, service corporation, or a person authorized in writing by an association may act as an agent for others except that an association may not act as an insurer or transact insurance as agent for an insurer. Any savings and loan association holding company or any service corporation that acts as an agent of an insurer shall conform to the requirements of Section 7455 and Section 770.1 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 983, Sec. 6.5.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

6521.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Division 6 (commencing with Section 17000) or any other provision of law, an association or service corporation may act as an escrow agent in connection with the sale, transfer, encumbering or leasing of real or personal property.

(b) The name for any subdivision of an association operating as an escrow agent pursuant to this section, if different from the name of the association, shall be approved by the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 983, Sec. 7.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

6522.

(a) An association that declares and pays dividends may distribute its own shares or may make payments in cash or property. Payment of cash or property shall be made only if there is a sufficient balance of unappropriated retained earnings which is that portion of income retained in the business since its organization or reorganization and which has not been appropriated or reserved for some specific purpose. Dividends shall not be distributed unless the association meets its required statutory net worth before and after that distribution. No dividends shall be paid if that payment would cause the
 association to be in an impaired condition.

(b) A stock split, as defined in Section 188 of the Corporations Code, and a reverse stock split, as defined in Section 182 of the Corporations Code, are authorized and shall not be construed to be dividends within the meaning of this section.

(c) Any distribution of permanent capital or paid in surplus shall require prior approval of the commissioner.

(d) Any shareholder who receives any distribution prohibited by this section with knowledge of facts indicating the impropriety thereof is liable to the association for the amount received. The commissioner may bring an action for the benefit of the association to recover the distribution from the shareholder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1162, Sec. 11.   Effective September 26, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

6523.

(a) An association may use advertising, whether printed, broadcasted by radio, televised, displayed, or communicated in any other manner or make any representation that is accurate and does not misrepresent its services, contracts, investments, or financial condition.

(b) The commissioner may require an association to file a true copy of the text of any advertising in the office of the commissioner at least five days prior to its issuance, circulation, or publication. Advertising filed under this subdivision may be used upon the commissioner’s express approval or failure
 to disapprove it within five days of its filing.

(c) Associations shall not issue, circulate, or publish any advertising after notice in writing from the commissioner that in the commissioner’s opinion the advertising is inaccurate or misrepresents the association’s services, contracts, investments, or financial condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6524.

An association may organize, sponsor, operate, control, or render investment advice to, an investment company, or underwrite, distribute, or sell securities of any investment company which has qualified to sell its securities in this state pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 1 of Title 4 of the Corporations Code, if the officers and employees of the association who sell these securities meet such standards with respect to training experience, and sales practices as established by the Savings and Loan Commissioner. For the purpose of this section, “investment company” means an investment company as defined in the Investment
 Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C., Sec. 80a-1 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6525.

(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 1051, 1052, and 1054 of the Labor Code and Section 2947 of the Penal Code, an association, a subsidiary or affiliate of an association, or any officer or employee thereof may deliver fingerprints taken of a director, an officer, an employee, or an applicant for employment to local, state, or federal law enforcement agencies for the purpose of obtaining information as to the existence and nature of a criminal record, if any, of the person fingerprinted relating to convictions, and to any arrest for which that person is released on bail or on his or her own
 recognizance pending trial, for the commission or attempted commission of a crime involving robbery, burglary, theft, embezzlement, fraud, forgery, bookmaking, receiving stolen property, counterfeiting, or involving checks or credit cards or using computers.

(b) The Department of Justice shall, pursuant to Section 11105 of the Penal Code, and a local agency may pursuant to Section 13300 of the Penal Code, furnish to the officer of the association or subsidiary or affiliate thereof responsible for the final decision regarding employment of the person fingerprinted, or to his or her designees having responsibilities for personnel or security decisions in the usual scope and course of their employment with the association, subsidiary, or affiliate summary criminal history information when requested pursuant to this section. If, upon evaluation of the criminal history information received pursuant to this section, the association, subsidiary, or
 affiliate determines that employment of the person fingerprinted would constitute an unreasonable risk to the association, subsidiary, or affiliate or its customers, the person fingerprinted may be denied employment.

(c) A request for records pursuant to this section made of the Department of Justice shall be on a form approved by the department. The department may charge a fee to be paid by the requesting association, subsidiary, or affiliate pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code. No request shall be submitted without the written consent of the person fingerprinted.

(d) Any criminal history information obtained pursuant to this section is confidential and no recipient shall disclose its contents other than for the purpose for which it was acquired.

(e) “Affiliate,” as used in this section,
 means any corporation controlling, controlled by, or under common control with, a savings association, whether directly, indirectly, or through one or more intermediaries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 868, Sec. 6.   Effective September 26, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

6525.5.

Except with the prior written consent of the commissioner:

(a) No person who has been convicted of any criminal offense involving dishonesty or breach of trust may participate, directly or indirectly, in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of a savings association.

(b) A savings association shall not permit any person who has been convicted of any criminal offense involving dishonesty or breach of trust to participate, directly or indirectly, in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of the savings
 association.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

6526.

An association may issue commercial and standby letters of credit in conformance with the Uniform Commercial Code or the Uniform Customs and Practice for Documentary Credits Act and may pledge collateral to secure its obligations thereunder. Except as otherwise provided by regulations of the commissioner, such issuance shall be subject to the following requirements:

(a) Each letter of credit must conspicuously state that it is a letter of credit.

(b) The issuer’s undertaking must contain a specified expiration date or be for a
 definite term, and must be limited in amount.

(c) The issuer’s obligation to pay must be solely dependent upon the presentation of conforming documents as specified in the letter of credit, and not upon the factual performance or non-performance by the parties to the underlying transaction.

(d) The account party must have an unqualified obligation to reimburse the issuer for payments made under the letter of credit.

To the extent funds are advanced under a letter of credit without compensation from the account party, the amount shall be treated as an extension of credit subject to percentage of assets limits and other requirements under an applicable provision of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6527.

If a loan or other investment is authorized under more than one section of this division an association may designate under which section the loan or investment has been made. Such a loan or investment may be apportioned among appropriate categories, and may be moved, in whole or in part, from one category to another.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6528.

An association may provide correspondent services primarily to other depository institutions to the extent that the activity does not violate other provisions of law.

(a) An association may maintain a noninterest-bearing account at any institution at which accounts are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, if the account is necessary or incidental to a correspondent relationship.

(b) An association may receive non-interest-bearing deposits from correspondent institutions for use as compensating balances, for
 settlement purposes, or for other purposes incidental to a correspondent relationship. These deposits may be payable on demand and subject to withdrawal by negotiable or transferable instrument, order, or authorization. These deposits shall not give rise to voting rights of membership in a state mutual association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

6529.

(a) No affiliated person of a savings association may receive, either directly or indirectly, from the association, a subsidiary thereof, or any other source any fee or other compensation of any kind in connection with the procurement of a loan from that association or subsidiary.

(b) No savings association shall give and no person shall accept any fee, kickback, or thing of value pursuant to any agreement or understanding, oral or otherwise, that business incident to or part of a real estate closing service shall be referred to any person by the savings association or
 by a subsidiary or affiliated person thereof, in connection with any loan on real property made by a savings association or subsidiary thereof.

(c) Other than for services actually performed, no person shall give and no savings association or subsidiary or affiliated person thereof shall accept any portion, split, or percentage of any charge made or received for the rendering of a real estate closing service in connection with a transaction involving a loan on real property made by a savings association or subsidiary thereof.

(d) For purposes of subdivisions (b) and (c), “real estate closing service” includes any service provided in connection with the execution of a real estate escrow transaction, including, but not limited to, title searches, title examinations, the provision of title reports, title insurance, services rendered by an attorney, the preparation of documents,
 property surveys, the rendering of credit reports or appraisals, pest and fungus inspections, services rendered by a real estate licensee, and the handling of the processing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

6530.

(a) No savings association may discharge or otherwise discriminate against any employee with respect to compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges of employment because the employee (or any person acting pursuant to the request of the employee) provided information to the commissioner, the Attorney General, or any district attorney regarding a possible violation of any law or regulation by the savings association or any of its officers, directors, or employees. 

(b) Any employee or former employee who believes he or she has been discharged or discriminated against
 in violation of subdivision (a) may file a civil action in superior court before the close of the 2-year period beginning on the date of that discharge or discrimination. The plaintiff shall also file a copy of the complaint initiating the civil action with the commissioner.

(c) If the court determines that a violation of subdivision (a) has occurred, it may order the association which committed the violation to do any of the following:

(1) Reinstate the employee to his or her former position.

(2) Pay compensatory damages.

(3) Take other appropriate actions to remedy any past discrimination.

(d) The protections of this section shall not apply to any employee who does either of the
 following:

(1) Deliberately causes or participates in the alleged violation of law or regulation.

(2) Knowingly or recklessly provides substantially false information to the commissioner, the Attorney General, or any district attorney.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1118, Sec. 36.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Branching and Agency Powers [6550. - 6558.]

6550.

(a) A branch office is a legally established place of business of an association other than the home office, a remote service unit, or any agency, authorized by the board of directors and approved by the commissioner, where the business of an association may be conducted.

(b) An association may, with the approval of the commissioner, conduct business outside this state, subject to the laws of the state in which the business is done.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6551.

(a) An agency of an association is a place or facility, stationary or mobile, other than the home office, a remote service unit, or a branch office, at or through which the association may transact business that is specified by the board of directors and approved by the commissioner.

(b) The agency may perform other special duties and functions as may be directed from time to time by the home office or a branch office and approved by the commissioner.

(c) An agency may perform only those activities,
 duties, or functions as are authorized for savings associations by the provisions of this division or regulations of the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 718, Sec. 11.5.)
-------------------------------------------

6552.

No association may establish or maintain a branch office or agency without the prior written approval of the commissioner, except that temporary and incidental agencies may be created for individual transactions and for special temporary purposes without approval.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6553.

(a) Each application for approval of the establishment and maintenance of a branch office or one or more agencies shall include the following:

(1) The proposed location of the branch or agency.

(2) The functions to be performed at the branch or agency.

(3) Any additional information the commissioner deems necessary to reach a decision.

(b) Each application shall be accompanied by
 the filing fee as prescribed pursuant to Section 9001 and by a budget of the association for the current earnings period and for the next succeeding annual period, which reflects the estimated additional expense of the maintenance of each branch or agency covered by the application.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6554.

Upon receipt of a complete application for a branch office, the commissioner shall give written notice of the filing of the application to each association. The notice shall state the name of the association and the name of the city or community in which the branch is proposed to be located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 983, Sec. 8.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

6555.

(a) Before acting on an application for a branch office, the commissioner may hold a hearing at a time and place specified in a notice of hearing.

(b) If a hearing is to be held, the hearing shall not be held less than 10 days after the mailing of a notice of hearing under subdivision (a).

(c) Any person may appear at the hearing in person or by agent or attorney, and, pursuant to regulations issued by the commissioner, show cause why the application should not be
 approved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 983, Sec. 9.   Effective September 26, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

6556.

(a) Upon review of the application for a branch office or agency and after a hearing on the branch application, if one is deemed necessary, the commissioner shall determine whether all of the following criteria are met:

(1) The applicant’s policies, financial condition, and operations afford no basis for supervisory objection.

(2) The proposed branch office or agency will be opened within a reasonable time after approval, as determined by the commissioner.

(b) If the commissioner determines that the criteria set forth in subdivision (a) are met the application shall be approved.

(c) If the commissioner determines that the criteria set forth in subdivision (a) are not met the application shall be denied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 730, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

6557.

The provisions of this article relating to branch office and agency applications do not apply to a branch office or agency of an existing association acquired pursuant to a merger, consolidation, conversion, or transfer of assets.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6558.

The commissioner may adopt rules and regulations relating to any action pertaining to branch offices and agencies regulated by this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Savings Operations [6600. - 7154.]



  ARTICLE 1. Savings Liability [6600. - 6603.]

6600.

The savings liability of an association shall consist only of the aggregate amount of its savings accounts, plus interest earned or credited to the accounts, less redemption and withdrawal payments.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6601.

Except as limited by the association from time to time or by state or federal law or regulations, account holders may make additions to their savings accounts in amounts and at times they elect.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1091, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

6602.
